Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20142-1513
Water Sustainability Fund; legislative
analysis.

The
Appropriations Committee of the Legislature shall, beginning with the FY2019-21
biennial budget review process, conduct a biennial analysis of the financial
status of the Water Sustainability Fund, including a review of the committed
and uncommitted balance of the fund and the financial impact of pending programs,
projects, or activities. The committee shall base its recommendation for transfers
to the Water Sustainability Fund upon information provided in the review process.

Laws 2014, LB1098, § 10.